South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S5.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-3-42. The South Carolina Law Enforcement Division must not include an unadjudicated arrest of a person in a record that may be released pursuant to a criminal history background check. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----